Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-611
Appeal; procedure.

The defendant shall have the right of appeal from any judgment of a county court pursuant to sections 25-2728 to 25-2737.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 324, p. 797;

R.S.1913, § 8975;

C.S.1922, § 9999;

Laws 1923, c. 113, § 1, p. 271;

C.S.1929, § 29-611;

Laws 1937, c. 66, § 1, p. 249;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 29-611;

R.S.1943, § 29-611;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 169;

Laws 1973, LB 6, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 52;

Laws 1986, LB 529, § 29.